Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SCHOOL-LINKED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for school-linked behavioral health grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4901. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FAMILY PEER SPECIALIST START-UP GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for start-up grants to develop certified family peer specialist services within existing children's mental health providers under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4889, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (18). This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MOBILE CRISIS GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for mobile crisis grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 245.4661, subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (15), and 245.4889, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (4). This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS FOR HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONALS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for mental health grants for health care professionals under Laws 2022, chapter 99, article 1, section 46, as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 4, section 94. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CHILDREN'S RESIDENTIAL MENTAL HEALTH CRISIS STABILIZATION GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for grants to direct service providers and partnering county human services agencies to provide children's residential mental health crisis stabilization services. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end